Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1473
Aircraft; operation while under influence of liquor or drug; chemical test; refusal; penalty.

Any person arrested pursuant to sections 28-1465 to 28-1474 may, upon the direction of a law enforcement officer, be required to submit to a chemical test of his or her blood or breath for a determination of the alcohol content. Any person who refuses to submit to a chemical blood or breath test required pursuant to sections 28-1465 to 28-1474 shall be guilty of a crime and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished in the same manner as he or she would be if convicted for a violation of section 28-1465.

Laws 1978, LB 903, § 9;

Laws 2001, LB 773, § 5.